District of Columbia statutes.
5-331.14

Police-media relations.

(a)

Within 90 days of April 13, 2005, the Chief of Police, pursuant to subchapter 1 of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules governing police passes for media personnel.

(b)

Within 90 days of April 13, 2005, the Chief of Police shall develop and implement a written policy governing interactions between the MPD and media representatives who are in or near an area where a First Amendment assembly is ongoing and who are reporting on the First Amendment assembly. The policy shall be consistent with the requirements of subsection (c) of this section.

(c)

(1)

The MPD shall allow media representatives reasonable access to all areas where a First Amendment assembly is occurring. At a minimum, the MPD shall allow media representatives no less access than that enjoyed by members of the general public and, consistent with public safety considerations, shall allow media representatives access to promote public knowledge of the assembly.

(2)

The MPD personnel located in or near an area where a First Amendment assembly is ongoing shall recognize and honor media credentials issued by or officially recognized by the MPD.

(3)

The MPD shall make reasonable accommodations to allow media representatives effectively to use photographic, video, or other equipment relating to their reporting of a First Amendment assembly.

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-352, § 114, 52 DCR 2296

History